Utah statutes.
16-7-3.   Contents of articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation shall specify:

(1)  The name of the corporation by which it shall be known.

(2)  The object of the corporation.

(3)  The estimated value of the property at the time of the making of articles of incorporation.

(4)  The title of the person making such articles.



No Change Since 1953

